Utah statutes.
76-7-307.   Medical procedure required to save life of unborn child.
If an abortion is performed when the unborn child is sufficiently developed to
have any reasonable possibility of survival outside its mother's womb, the
medical procedure used must be that which, in the best medical judgment of the
physician will give the unborn child the best chance of survival.  No medical
procedure designed to kill or injure that unborn child may be used unless
necessary, in the opinion of the woman's physician, to prevent grave damage to
her medical health.
